Wyoming, session 2026, HB0107.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 39-15-601 through 39-15-603 are
created to read:
ARTICLE 6
LOCAL GOVERNMENT DISTRIBUTIONS
39-15-601. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(i) "Population" of a city, town or county shall
be determined by resort to the most recently completed
federal decennial census as reported by the economic
analysis division within the department of administration
and information.
39-15-602. Local government distributions of state
sales and use taxes; supplemental funding formula; revenue
challenged formula.
(a) An amount equal to eight percent (8%) of all
sales taxes imposed under W.S. 39-15-104(a) and (b) and use
taxes imposed under W.S. 39-16-104(a) and (b) that are
collected and accrued for the immediately preceding fiscal
year, as determined by the department of revenue, shall be
transferred from the general fund to the office of state
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 11, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
lands and investments for distribution to cities, towns and
counties to be allocated as follows and as further provided
in this section:
(i) Two-thirds (2/3) of eighty-nine percent
(89%) of the total amount for direct distribution to cities
and towns provided that five percent (5%) of the amount
available under this paragraph shall only be distributed
for direct distributions to cities and towns using the
revenue challenged formula as provided in paragraph (b)(ii)
of this section;
(ii) One-third (1/3) of eighty-nine percent
(89%) of the total amount for direct distribution to
counties;
(iii) Five and one-half percent (5.5%) of the
total amount for direct distribution to cities and towns
provided that five percent (5%) of the amount available
under this paragraph shall only be distributed for direct
distributions to cities and towns using the revenue
challenged formula as provided in paragraph (b)(ii) of this
section;
(iv) Five and one-half percent (5.5%) of the
total amount for direct distribution to counties.
(b) Funds distributed in paragraphs (a)(i) and (iii)
of this section shall be distributed to cities and towns
each fiscal year. Distributions shall be made in equal
amounts on October 15 and March 15 of each fiscal year as
calculated from revenues collected and accrued in the
immediately preceding fiscal year prior to the October 15
distribution, subject to the following:
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 11, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(i) Except as provided in paragraph (ii) of this
subsection, from these distributions each municipality with
a population of thirty-five (35) or less shall first
receive fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00) and each
municipality with a population over thirty-five (35) shall
first receive thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000.00).
From the remainder, each municipality shall receive amounts
in accordance with a municipal supplemental funding formula
as provided in this paragraph. The municipal supplemental
funding formula shall be calculated by the office of state
lands and investments as follows:
(A) Calculate the per capita sales and use
tax revenues available to each municipality using the sales
and use tax distributions to the county where each
municipality is located attributable to the most recently
completed fiscal year, including distributions to each
municipality within that county under W.S. 39-15-111 and
39-16-111 but excluding the distribution exclusively to
counties under W.S. 39-15-111(b)(iii) made from an amount
equivalent to one percent (1%) of the tax collected under
W.S. 39-15-104 and excluding the distribution exclusively
to counties under W.S. 39-16-111(b)(iii) made from an
amount equivalent to one percent (1%) of the tax collected
under W.S. 39-16-104;
(B) Calculate the inverse by dividing one
(1) by the per capita sales and use tax numbers determined
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph for each
municipality;
(C) Calculate the normalized per capita
sales and use tax number for each municipality by dividing
the number determined under subparagraph (B) of this
paragraph for the municipality by the total of all inverse
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 11, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
per capita sales and use tax numbers calculated under
subparagraph (B) of this paragraph;
(D) Multiply the normalized per capita
sales and use tax number for each municipality by
seventy-five percent (75%);
(E) Calculate the per capita assessed value
for the prior tax year corresponding to the most recently
completed calendar year for each municipality by dividing
the total assessed valuation within the municipality by the
population of the municipality;
(F) Calculate the inverse by dividing one
(1) by the per capita assessed value determined under
subparagraph (E) of this paragraph for each municipality;
(G) Calculate the normalized per capita
assessed value number for each municipality by dividing the
number determined under subparagraph (F) of this paragraph
for the municipality by the total of all inverse per capita
assessed value numbers calculated under subparagraph (F) of
this paragraph;
(H) Multiply the normalized per capita
assessed value number for each municipality by twenty-five
percent (25%);
(J) Multiply the sum of subparagraphs (D)
and (H) of this paragraph for each municipality by the
population of the municipality;
(K) Calculate the normalized index for each
municipality by dividing the number determined under
subparagraph (J) of this paragraph for the municipality by
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 11, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
the sum of all numbers calculated under subparagraph (J) of
this paragraph;
(M) Determine the amount to distribute to
each municipality by multiplying the normalized index
number determined under subparagraph (K) of this paragraph
by the amount remaining available for distribution under
this paragraph.
(ii) From the funds distributed in paragraphs
(a)(i) and (iii) of this section, each city or town shall
receive amounts in accordance with a city and town revenue
challenged formula as provided in this paragraph. The
revenue challenged formula shall be calculated by the
office of state lands and investments as follows:
(A) Calculate the lowest quartile amount
received by cities and towns on a per capita basis using
amounts received under this section plus amounts
distributed to each city and town using the sales and use
tax distributions to the county where each municipality is
located attributable to the most recently completed fiscal
year under this paragraph, including distributions to each
municipality within that county under W.S. 39-15-111 and
39-16-111 but excluding the distribution exclusively to
counties under W.S. 39-15-111(b)(iii) made from an amount
equivalent to one percent (1%) of the tax collected under
W.S. 39-15-104 and excluding the distribution exclusively
to counties under W.S. 39-16-111(b)(iii) made from an
amount equivalent to one percent (1%) of the tax collected
under W.S. 39-16-104;
(B) Determine each city or town that
received a per capita amount that is less than the lowest
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 11, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
quartile amount determined under subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph;
(C) For each city or town that received a
per capita amount that is less than the lowest quartile
amount as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph,
determine the amount that would be necessary to increase
the per capita amount distributed to that city or town to
the lowest quartile amount determined under subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph;
(D) Determine the amount to distribute to
each city or town that received an amount that is less than
the lowest quartile amount determined under subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph by distributing the amount available
under this paragraph on a pro rata basis, up to the lowest
quartile amount, based on the amounts determined under
subparagraph (C) of this paragraph.
(c) Funds distributed in paragraphs (a)(ii) and (iv)
of this section are to be distributed to counties each
fiscal year. Distributions shall be made in equal amounts
on October 15 and March 15 of each fiscal year as
calculated from revenues collected and accrued for the
immediately preceding fiscal year prior to the October 15
distribution. From these distributions each county shall
receive the following:
(i) Each county with an assessed value for the
tax year prior to the most recently completed calendar year
of less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00)
per mill shall first receive an amount equal to three (3)
times the difference between three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000.00) and the actual value of one (1) mill within
the county. From the remainder, each county shall receive
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 11, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
amounts in accordance with a county supplemental funding
formula as provided in this paragraph. The county
supplemental funding formula shall be calculated by the
office of state lands and investments as follows:
(A) Calculate the per capita sales and use
tax revenues available to each county using the sales and
use tax distributions to each county attributable to the
most recently completed fiscal year, excluding
distributions to each municipality within that county under
W.S. 39-15-111 and 39-16-111;
(B) Calculate the inverse by dividing one
(1) by the per capita sales and use tax number determined
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph for each county;
(C) Calculate the normalized per capita
sales and use tax number for each county by dividing the
number determined under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph
for the county by the total of all inverse per capita sales
and use tax numbers calculated under subparagraph (B) of
this paragraph;
(D) Multiply the normalized per capita
sales and use tax number determined under subparagraph (C)
of this paragraph for each county by twenty-four percent
(24%);
(E) Calculate the per capita assessed value
for each county by dividing the total assessed valuation
within the county for the tax year prior to the most
recently completed calendar year by the population of the
county;
7

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 11, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(F) Calculate the inverse by dividing one
(1) by the per capita assessed value determined under
subparagraph (E) of this paragraph for each county;
(G) Calculate the normalized per capita
assessed value number for each county by dividing the
number determined under subparagraph (F) of this paragraph
for the county by the total of all inverse per capita
assessed value numbers calculated under subparagraph (F) of
this paragraph;
(H) Multiply the normalized per capita
assessed value number determined under subparagraph (G) of
this paragraph for each county by seventy-six percent
(76%);
(J) Calculate a cost of government index
for each county, which shall be determined by multiplying
six hundred twenty-eight (628) by the population of the
county and then adding nine million nine hundred thousand
(9,900,000) to the result;
(K) Calculate the normalized cost of
government index number for each county by dividing the
number determined under subparagraph (J) of this paragraph
for the county by the total of all cost of government index
numbers calculated under subparagraph (J) of this
paragraph;
(M) Multiply the sum of subparagraphs (D)
and (H) of this paragraph by the normalized cost of
government index number determined in subparagraph (K) of
this paragraph for each county;
8

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 11, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(N) Calculate the normalized index for each
county by dividing the number determined under subparagraph
(M) of this paragraph for the county by the total of all
numbers calculated under subparagraph (M) of this
paragraph;
(O) Determine the amount to distribute to
each county by multiplying the normalized index number
determined under subparagraph (N) of this paragraph by the
amount remaining available for distribution under this
paragraph.
39-15-603. Legislative intent.
(a) It is the intent of the legislature that the
funds distributed under this article shall not be used for:
(i) Salary adjustments, additional personnel or
increased personnel benefits;
(ii) Any compensation to the members of any
board for which the board of county commissioners appoints
members, unless compensation is otherwise required by law.
9

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 11, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
10